Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-699
Regulation of markets.

No charge or assessment of any kind shall be made or levied on any vehicle or on the owner of any vehicle bringing produce or provisions to any market place in the city, or standing in or occupying a place in any of the market places of the city, or in the street contiguous to such market places on market days. The mayor and city council shall have full power to prescribe the kind and description of articles which may be sold and the stand or place to be occupied by the vendors and may authorize the immediate seizure and arrest and removal from the markets of any person violating the regulations as established by ordinance, together with any article of produce in his or her possession, and the immediate seizure and destruction of tainted or unsound meat, provisions, or other articles of food.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 36, p. 239;

R.S.1913, § 4970;

C.S.1922, § 4139;

C.S.1929, § 16-669;

R.S.1943, § 16-699;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 160.